California statutes. Business and Professions Code
The program established pursuant to this article shall not be funded, directly or indirectly, from an increase in the fees charged to physician assistants pursuant to Section 3521.1. This article does not excuse physician assistants trained pursuant to this article from paying the fees established pursuant to Section 3521.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 19.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3537.50.

No General Fund revenues shall be expended to carry out this article. The implementation of the pilot program and, if applicable, the permanent program established by this article shall be contingent upon the availability of federal funds, which do not divert or detract from funds currently utilized to underwrite existing physician assistant training programs or to fund existing functions of the board. The new funding shall be sufficient to cover the full additional cost to the educational institution or institutions that establish the program or programs, the cost of tuition and attendance for the students in the program or programs, and any additional costs, including enforcement costs, that the department or the board incurs as a result of implementing this
 article. This article does not impose any obligations upon the department, the board, or any physician assistant training program in the absence of adequate funding as described in this section. This article does not preclude applicants for the program established by this article from seeking state or federal scholarship funds, or state and federal loan repayment funds available to physician assistant students, or require any applicants be granted preference in the award of those funds. This article does not impair the autonomy of any institution that offers a physician assistant training program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 23.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Physicians’ Assistants Corporations [3540. - 3545.]

3540.

A physician assistants corporation is a corporation which is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, so long as that corporation and its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees rendering professional services who are certified physician assistants are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, the provisions of this article, and all other statutes and regulations now or hereafter enacted or adopted pertaining to the corporation and the conduct of its affairs.

With respect to a physician assistants corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3
 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code is the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 81.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3541.

It shall constitute unprofessional conduct and a violation of this chapter for any person licensed under this chapter to violate, attempt to violate, directly or indirectly, or assist in or abet the violation of, or conspire to violate any provision or term of this article, the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, or any regulations duly adopted under those laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1304, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3542.

A physician assistant corporation shall not do or fail to do any act the doing of which or the failure to do which would constitute unprofessional conduct under any statute or regulation, now or hereafter in effect. In the conduct of its practice, it shall observe and be bound by these statutes and regulations to the same extent as a person holding a license under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 122.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3543.

The name of a physician assistant corporation and any name or names under which it may render professional services shall contain the words “physician assistant,” and wording or abbreviations denoting corporate existence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 123.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3544.

Except as provided in Sections 13401.5 and 13403 of the Corporations Code, each shareholder, director and officer of a physician assistant corporation, except an assistant secretary and an assistant treasurer, shall be a licensed person as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 124.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3545.

The income of a physician assistant corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of the shareholder or their shares in the physician assistant corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 22.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.8. Polysomnographic Technologists [3575. - 3579.]

3575.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Board” means the Medical Board of California.

(2) “Polysomnography” means the treatment, management, diagnostic testing, control, education, and care of patients with sleep and wake disorders. Polysomnography shall include, but not be limited to, the process of analysis, monitoring, and recording of physiologic data during sleep and wakefulness to assist in the treatment of disorders, syndromes, and dysfunctions that are sleep-related, manifest during sleep, or disrupt normal sleep activities. Polysomnography shall also include, but not be limited to, the therapeutic and diagnostic use of oxygen, the use of positive
 airway pressure including continuous positive airway pressure (CPAP) and bilevel modalities, adaptive servo-ventilation, and maintenance of nasal and oral airways that do not extend into the trachea.

(3) “Supervision” means that the supervising physician and surgeon shall remain available, either in person or through telephonic or electronic means, at the time that the polysomnographic services are provided.

(b) (1) Within one year after the effective date of this chapter, the board shall promulgate regulations relative to the qualifications for the registration of individuals as certified polysomnographic technologists, polysomnographic technicians, and polysomnographic trainees. The qualifications for a certified polysomnographic technologist shall include all of the following:

(A) The
 applicant shall have valid, current credentials as a polysomnographic technologist issued by a national accrediting agency approved by the board.

(B) The applicant shall have graduated from a polysomnographic educational program that has been approved by the board.

(C) The applicant shall have passed a national certifying examination that has been approved by the board.

(2) An applicant for
 registration as a certified polysomnographic technologist may satisfy the qualifications described in paragraph (1) by submitting proof to the board that they have been practicing polysomnography for at least five years in a manner that is acceptable to the board. However, beginning three years after the effective date of this chapter, all individuals seeking to obtain certification as a polysomnographic technologist shall have passed a national certifying examination that has been approved by the board.

(c) (1) In accordance with Section 2042, any person seeking registration from the board as a certified polysomnographic technologist, a polysomnographic technician, or a polysomnographic trainee shall be subject to a state- and federal-level criminal offender record information search conducted through the Department of Justice as specified in paragraph (2).

(2) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all applicants for registration as a certified polysomnographic technologist, a polysomnographic technician, or a polysomnographic trainee, as defined by this section, to determine whether the applicant has a criminal conviction record in this state or in any other jurisdiction, including foreign countries, pursuant to Section 2042. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code for the board to determine whether the applicant is subject to denial of licensure under the provisions of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(d) An individual may use the title “certified polysomnographic technologist” and may engage in the practice of polysomnography only under the following circumstances:

(1) The individual is registered with the board and has successfully undergone a state- and federal-level criminal offender record information search pursuant to subdivision (c).

(2) The individual works under the supervision and direction of a licensed physician and surgeon.

(3) The individual meets the requirements of this chapter.

(e) Within one year after the effective date of this chapter, the board shall adopt regulations that establish the means and circumstances in which a licensed physician and surgeon may employ polysomnographic technicians and polysomnographic trainees. The board may also adopt regulations specifying the scope of services that may be provided by a polysomnographic technician or polysomnographic trainee. Any regulation adopted pursuant to this section may specify the level of supervision that polysomnographic technicians and trainees are required to have when working under the supervision of a certified polysomnographic technologist or licensed health care professional.

(f) This section shall not apply to California licensed allied health professionals, including, but not limited to, respiratory care practitioners, working within the scope of practice of their license.

(g) Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to authorize a polysomnographic technologist, technician, or trainee to treat, manage, control, educate, or care for patients other than those with sleep disorders or to provide diagnostic testing for patients other than those with suspected sleep disorders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 14.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3575.5.

Each application for registration as a polysomnographic technologist, technician, or trainee shall be made upon an online electronic form, or other form, provided by the board, and each application form shall contain a legal verification by the applicant certifying under penalty of perjury that the information provided by the applicant is true and correct and that any information in supporting documents provided by the applicant is true and correct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 45.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3576.

(a) A registration under this chapter may be denied, suspended, revoked, placed on probation, or otherwise subjected to discipline for any of the following by the holder:

(1) Incompetence, gross negligence, or repeated similar negligent acts performed by the registrant.

(2) An act of dishonesty or fraud.

(3) Committing any act or being convicted of a crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure or registration under Section 480.

(4) Violating or attempting to violate this chapter or any regulation adopted under this
 chapter.

(b) Proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 303, Sec. 12.   (AB 2745)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3576.1.

(a) A person whose registration has been voluntarily surrendered while under investigation or while charges are pending or whose registration has been revoked or suspended or placed on probation, may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of penalty, including modification or termination of probation.

(b) The person may file the petition after a period of not less than the following minimum periods have elapsed from the effective date of the surrender of the registration or the decision ordering that disciplinary action:

(1) At least three years for reinstatement of a registration surrendered or revoked for unprofessional
 conduct, except that the board may, for good cause shown, specify in a revocation order that a petition for reinstatement may be filed after two years.

(2) At least two years for early termination of probation of three years or more.

(3) At least one year for modification of a condition, or reinstatement of a registration surrendered or revoked for mental or physical illness, or termination of probation of less than three years.

(c) The petition shall state any facts as may be required by the board. The petition shall be accompanied by at least two verified recommendations from polysomnographic technologists registered in any state who have personal knowledge of the activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary penalty was imposed.

(d) The
 petition may be heard by a panel of the board. The board may assign the petition to an administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code. After a hearing on the petition, the administrative law judge shall provide a proposed decision to the board, which shall be acted upon in accordance with Section 2335.

(e) The panel of the board or the administrative law judge hearing the petition may consider all activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken, the offense for which the petitioner was disciplined, the petitioner’s activities during the time the registration was in good standing, and the petitioner’s rehabilitative efforts, general reputation for truth, and professional ability. The hearing may be continued from time to time as the administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code finds necessary.

(f) The
 administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code reinstating a registration or modifying a penalty may recommend the imposition of any terms and conditions deemed necessary.

(g) No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole. No petition shall be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the person. The board may deny without a hearing or argument any petition filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of the prior decision following a hearing under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 303, Sec. 13.   (AB 2745)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3576.2.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the board shall revoke the registration of any person who has been required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal for conduct that occurred on or after January 1, 2017.

(b) This section shall not apply to a person who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code solely because of a misdemeanor conviction under Section 314 of the Penal Code.

(c) This section shall not apply to a person who has been relieved under Section 290.5 of the Penal Code of his or her duty to register as a sex offender, or whose duty to register has
 otherwise been formally terminated under California law.

(d) A proceeding to revoke a registration pursuant to this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 303, Sec. 14.   (AB 2745)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3576.3.

(a) The board may suspend or revoke the registration of a polysomnographic technologist, polysomnographic technician, or polysomnographic trainee for unprofessional conduct as described in this section.

(b) The use of any controlled substance or the use of any of the dangerous drugs specified in Section 4022, or of alcoholic beverages, to the extent, or in such a manner as to be dangerous or injurious to the registrant, or to any other person or to the public, or to the extent that this use impairs the ability of the registrant to practice safely or more than one misdemeanor or any felony conviction involving the use, consumption, or self-administration of any of the substances referred to in this
 section, or any combination thereof, constitutes unprofessional conduct. The record of the conviction is conclusive evidence of this unprofessional conduct.

(c) A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The board may order discipline of the registrant in accordance with Section 2227 or may order the denial of the registration when the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing this person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, complaint, information, or indictment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 303, Sec. 15.   (AB 2745)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3577.

(a) Each person who applies for registration under this chapter shall pay into the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California a fee to be fixed by the board at a sum of one hundred twenty dollars ($120).

(b) Each person to whom registration is granted under this chapter shall pay into the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California a fee to be fixed by the board at a sum of one hundred twenty dollars ($120).

(c) The registration shall expire after two years. The registration may be renewed biennially at a fee which shall be paid into the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California. For registrations that expire on or after January
 1, 2022, the fee amount shall be two hundred twenty dollars ($220).

(d) The fee for monitoring a registrant on probation shall be the cost of monitoring, as fixed by the board.

(e) The money in the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California that is collected pursuant to this section shall be used for the administration of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 46.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3578.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a clinic or health facility licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code from employing a certified polysomnographic technologist.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 635, Sec. 1.   (SB 132)   Effective October 23, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

3579.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to diagnostic electroencephalograms conducted in accordance with the guidelines of the American Clinical Neurophysiology Society.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 635, Sec. 1.   (SB 132)   Effective October 23, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Osteopathic Medicine [3600. - 3600.]

3600.

The law governing licentiates of the Osteopathic Medical Board of California is found in the Osteopathic Act and in Chapter 5 of Division 2, relating to medicine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 359, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.2. Naturopathic Doctors Act [3610. - 3686.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [3610. - 3615.]

3610.

This chapter may be cited as the Naturopathic Doctors Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 485, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3612.

The California Board of Naturopathic Medicine is hereby created within the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 414, Sec. 2.   (AB 2685)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3613.

The following definitions apply for the purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Board” means the California Board of Naturopathic Medicine. Any reference in any law or regulation to the Bureau of Naturopathic Medicine or the Naturopathic Medicine Committee shall be deemed to refer to the California Board of
 Naturopathic Medicine.

(b) “Naturopathic childbirth attendance” means the specialty practice of natural childbirth by a naturopathic doctor that includes the management of normal pregnancy, normal labor and delivery, and the normal postpartum period, including normal newborn care.

(c) “Naturopathic medicine” means a distinct and comprehensive system of primary health care practiced by a naturopathic doctor for the diagnosis, treatment, and prevention of human health conditions, injuries, and disease.

(d) “Naturopathic doctor” means a person who holds an active
 license issued pursuant to this chapter.

(e) “Naturopathy” means a noninvasive system of health practice that employs natural health modalities, substances, and education to promote health.

(f) “Drug” means any substance defined as a drug by Section 11014 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) “Naturopathic assistant” means a person who may be unlicensed, who performs basic administrative, clerical, and technical supportive services in compliance with this chapter for a licensed naturopathic doctor or naturopathic corporation and who is at least 18 years of age, and who has had at least the minimum amount of hours of appropriate training pursuant to standards established by the Medical Board of California for
 a medical assistant pursuant to Section 2069. The naturopathic assistant shall be issued a certificate by the training institution or instructor indicating satisfactory completion of the required training. A copy of the certificate shall be retained as a record by each employer or the naturopathic assistant.

(h) “Naturopathic technical supportive services” means simple routine medical tasks and procedures that may be safely performed by a naturopathic assistant who has limited training and who functions under the supervision of a licensed naturopathic doctor.

(i) “Specific authorization” means a specific written order prepared by the supervising naturopathic doctor authorizing the procedures to be performed on a patient, which shall be placed in the patient’s medical record, or a
 standing order prepared by the supervising naturopathic doctor authorizing the procedures to be performed. A notation of the standing order shall be placed on the patient’s medical record.

(j) “Supervision” means the supervision of procedures authorized under this section or Section 3640.2 by a naturopathic doctor, within their scope of practice, who is physically present in the treatment facility during the performance of those procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 414, Sec. 3.   (AB 2685)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3615.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 485, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [3620. - 3627.]

3620.

The board shall enforce and administer this chapter and shall be solely responsible for the implementation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 23.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3620.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the board in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 24.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3621.

(a) The board shall consist of nine members, consisting of seven members appointed by the Governor, one public member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and one public member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly. Members of the board shall include five members who are California-licensed
 naturopathic doctors, two members who are California-licensed physicians and surgeons, and two public members.

(b) A member of the board shall be appointed for a four-year term. A person shall not serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive terms. A member shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of the member’s successor, or until one year from the expiration of the term for which the member was appointed, whichever first occurs. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for unexpired terms.

(c) (1) A public member of the board shall be a resident of this state for at least five years preceding the public member’s appointment.

(2) A person
 shall not be appointed as a public member if the person or the person’s immediate family in any manner owns an interest in a college, school, or institution engaged in naturopathic education, or the person or the person’s immediate family has an economic interest in naturopathy or has any other conflict of interest. “Immediate family” means the public member’s spouse, domestic partner, parents, children, or children’s spouses or domestic partners.

(d) Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(e) The board may appoint a person exempt from civil service who shall be designated as an executive officer and who shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the board and vested in the executive officer by this chapter.

(f) Each appointing authority has power to remove from office at any time any member of the board appointed by that authority pursuant to Section 106.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 414, Sec. 4.   (AB 2685)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3621.5.

The board shall meet at least two times each calendar year and shall conduct additional meetings in appropriate locations that are necessary to transact its business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 25.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3622.

(a) The board shall adopt regulations in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Unless contrary to this chapter, regulations adopted by the Bureau of Naturopathic Medicine and the Naturopathic Medicine Committee shall continue to apply to the board and its licensees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 26.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3623.

(a) The board shall approve a naturopathic medical education program accredited by the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education or an equivalent federally recognized accrediting body for the naturopathic medical profession that has the following minimum requirements:

(1) Admission requirements that include a minimum of three-quarters of the credits required for a bachelor’s degree from a regionally accredited or preaccredited college or university or the equivalency, as determined by the council.

(2) Program requirements for its degree or diploma of a minimum of 4,100 total hours in basic and clinical sciences, naturopathic
 philosophy, naturopathic modalities, and naturopathic medicine. Of the total requisite hours, not less than 2,500 hours shall consist of academic instruction, and not less than 1,200 hours shall consist of supervised clinical training approved by the naturopathic medical school.

(b) A naturopathic medical education program in the United States shall offer graduate-level full-time studies and training leading to the degree of Doctor of Naturopathy or Doctor of Naturopathic Medicine. The program shall be an institution, or part of an institution of, higher education that is either accredited or is a candidate for accreditation by a regional institutional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Secretary of Education and the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education, or an equivalent federally recognized accrediting body for naturopathic
 doctor education.

(c) To qualify as an approved naturopathic medical school, a naturopathic medical program located in Canada or the United States shall offer a full-time, doctoral-level, naturopathic medical education program with its graduates being eligible to apply to the board for licensure and to the North American Board of Naturopathic Examiners that administers the naturopathic licensing examination.

(d) The naturopathic medical program shall evaluate an applicant’s education, training, and experience obtained in the armed services, pursuant to Section 35, and provide course credit where applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 27.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3624.

(a) The board may grant a certificate of registration to practice naturopathic medicine to a person who does not hold a naturopathic doctor’s license under this chapter and is offered a faculty position by the dean of a naturopathic medical education program approved by the board, if all of the following requirements are met to the satisfaction of the board:

(1) The applicant submits an application on a form prescribed by the board.

(2) The dean of the naturopathic medical education program demonstrates that the applicant has the requisite qualifications to assume the position to which they are to be appointed.

(3) The dean of the naturopathic medical education program certifies in writing to the board that the applicant will be under their direction and will not be permitted to practice naturopathic medicine unless incident to and a necessary part of the applicant’s duties as approved by the board.

(b) The holder of a certificate of registration issued under this section shall not receive compensation for, or practice, naturopathic medicine unless it is incidental to and a necessary part of the applicant’s duties in connection with the holder’s faculty position.

(c) A certificate of registration issued under this section is valid for two years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 28.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3624.5.

(a) This chapter does not apply to a practitioner licensed as a naturopathic doctor in another state or country who meets both of the following requirements:

(1) The practitioner is in consultation with a licensed practitioner of this state, or is an invited guest of any of the following for the purpose of professional education through lectures, clinics, or demonstrations:

(A) The California Medical Association.

(B) The Osteopathic Physicians and Surgeons of California.

(C) The California Podiatric Medical Association.

(D) The California Naturopathic Doctors Association.

(E) A component county society of subparagraph (A), (B),
 (C), or (D).

(2) The practitioner does not open an office, appoint a place to meet patients, receive calls from patients, give orders, or have ultimate authority over the care or primary diagnosis of a patient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 18, Sec. 14.   (AB 20 4x)   Effective October 23, 2009.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3626.

(a) The board may employ other officers and employees as necessary to discharge the duties of the board.

(b) The board shall employ a full-time staff position whose
 responsibilities shall include enforcement against violations of this chapter. This position shall be under the direction of the executive officer.

(c) The board shall not incur any costs as a result of changing the name of the Naturopathic Medicine Committee to the California Board of Naturopathic Medicine, as described in Sections 3612 and 3613, beyond what is absorbable within existing resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 414, Sec. 5.   (AB 2685)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3627.

(a) The board shall establish a naturopathic formulary advisory subcommittee to determine a naturopathic formulary based upon a review of naturopathic medical education and training.

(b) The naturopathic formulary advisory subcommittee shall be composed of an equal number of representatives from the clinical and academic settings of physicians and surgeons, pharmacists, and naturopathic doctors.

(c) The naturopathic formulary advisory subcommittee shall review naturopathic education, training, and practice and make specific recommendations regarding the prescribing, ordering, and furnishing authority of a naturopathic
 doctor and the required supervision and protocols for those functions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 29.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Licensure [3630. - 3637.]

3630.

An applicant for a license as a naturopathic doctor shall file an application with the board on a form provided by the board that shows, to the board’s satisfaction, compliance with all of the following requirements:

(a) The applicant has not committed an act or crime that constitutes grounds for denial of a license under Section 480 and has complied with the requirements of Section 144.

(b) The applicant has received a degree in naturopathic medicine from an approved naturopathic medical school where the degree substantially meets the educational requirements in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section
 3623.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 30.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3631.

(a) An applicant for licensure shall pass the Naturopathic Physicians Licensing Examination (NPLEX) or an equivalent examination approved by the North American Board of Naturopathic Examiners.

(b) In the absence of an examination approved by the North American Board of Naturopathic Examiners, the board may administer a substantially equivalent examination.

(c) The board may additionally require an applicant to pass any NPLEX elective examinations relevant to a licensee’s scope of practice in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 414, Sec. 6.   (AB 2685)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3633.

The board may grant a license to an applicant who is licensed and in good standing as a naturopathic doctor in another state, jurisdiction, or territory in the United States, if the applicant has met the requirements of Sections 3630 and 3631.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 31.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3633.1.

The board may grant a license to an applicant who meets the requirements of Section 3630, but who graduated before 1986, before the Naturopathic Physicians Licensing Examinations, or NPLEX, and passed a state or Canadian Province naturopathic licensing examination. Applications under this section shall be received no later than December 31, 2007.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 32.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3634.

A license issued under this chapter shall be subject to renewal biennially, as prescribed by the board, and shall expire unless renewed in that manner. The board may provide by regulation for the late renewal of a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 33.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3635.

(a) In addition to any other qualifications and requirements for licensure renewal, the board shall require the satisfactory completion of 60 hours of approved continuing education biennially. This requirement is waived for the initial license renewal. The continuing education shall meet the following requirements:

(1) At least 20 hours shall be in pharmacotherapeutics.

(2) No more than 15 hours may be in naturopathic medical journals or osteopathic or allopathic medical journals, or audio or
 videotaped presentations, slides, programmed instruction, or computer-assisted instruction or preceptorships.

(3) No more than 20 hours may be in any single topic.

(4) No more than 15 hours of the continuing education requirements for the specialty certificate in naturopathic childbirth attendance shall apply to the 60 hours of continuing education requirement.

(5) Course content shall pertain to the practice of naturopathic, osteopathic, or allopathic medicine.

(b) The continuing education requirements of this section may be met through continuing education courses approved by the 
 board, the California Naturopathic Doctors Association, the North American Naturopathic Continuing Education Accreditation Council, the American Association of Naturopathic Physicians, the California State Board of Pharmacy, or the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, or other courses that meet the standards for continuing education for licensed physicians and surgeons in California. All continuing education providers shall comply with Section 3635.2. Continuing education providers shall submit an annual declaration to the board that their educational activities satisfy the requirements described in Section 3635.2 and the board shall maintain a list of these providers on its internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 414, Sec. 7.   (AB 2685)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3635.1.
